lvlex.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +V +Future +Past +Present +3P +Sg +Pl 

LEXICON Root 
Noun ; 
Verb ; 

LEXICON Noun 
cat Ninf; 

LEXICON Verb 
kļū Vinf;
aug Vinf;
brauk Vinf;

LEXICON Ninf
+N+Sg:0 #;
+N+Pl:^s #; ! ^ is our morpheme boundary

LEXICON Vinf
+V:^t #;
+V+Past:^u #;
+V+Future:^šu #;
+V+Present:^u #;
